Utah statutes.
63M-5-103.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Commencement of construction" means any clearing of land, excavation, or
construction but does not include preliminary site review, including soil
tests, topographical surveys, exploratory drilling, boring or mining, or other
preliminary tests.
(2)  "Developer" means any person engaged or to be engaged in industrial
development or the development or utilization of natural resources in this
state through a natural resource or industrial facility, including owners,
contract purchases of owners, and persons who, as a lessee or under an
agreement, are engaged or to be engaged in industrial development or the
development or utilization of natural resources in this state through a
natural resource or industrial facility.
(3)  "Major developer" means any developer whose proposed new or additional
natural resource facility or industrial facility is projected:
(a)  To employ more than 500 people; or
(b)  To cause the population of an affected unit of local government to
increase by more than 5%, the increase to include the primary work force of
the facility and their dependents and the work force and dependents
attributable to commercial and public service employment created by the
presence of the facility.
(4)  "Natural resource facility" or "industrial facility" means any land,
structure, building, plant, mine, road, installation, excavation, machinery,
equipment, or device, or any addition to, reconstruction, replacement, or
improvement of, land or an existing structure, building, plant, mine, road,
installation, excavation, machinery, or device reasonably used, erected,
constructed, acquired, or installed by any person, if a substantial purpose of
or result of the use, erection, construction, acquisition, rental, lease, or
installation is related to industrial development or the development or
utilization of the natural resources in this state.
(5)  "Person" includes any individual, firm, co-partnership, joint venture,
corporation, estate, trust, business trust, syndicate, or any group or
combination acting as a unit.
(6)  "Unit of local government" means any county, municipality, school
district, local district, special service district, or any other political
subdivision of the state.
